District of Columbia statutes.
21-2213

Construction.

This subchapter shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-189, § 14, 35 DCR 8653
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 23(n), 40 DCR 6311
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-72, § 2(c)(7), 63 DCR 208
1981 Ed., § 21-2213.
The 2016 amendment by D.C. Law 21-72 substituted “subchapter” for “chapter.”